Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.550

Civil monetary penalty.

(1) The department may impose upon and collect a civil penalty from a person violating this chapter or the rules adopted under it.

(2) The civil penalty must not exceed one thousand dollars per violation per day, except the civil penalty for a violation of pull date requirements in RCW 15.130.300 must not exceed five hundred dollars.

(3) Each violation of this section is a separate and distinct offense.

[ 2018 c 236 s 506.]